Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.6905, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 39. new text end new text begin Road usage charge data. new text end new text begin Data related to road usage charges are governed by section 168.0132. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.002, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin All-electric vehicle. new text end new text begin "All-electric vehicle" has the meaning given in section 169.011, subdivision 1a. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, subdivision 1m, is amended to read: Subd. 1m. Electric vehicle. new text begin (a) new text end In addition to the tax under subdivision 1a, a surcharge of $75 is imposed for an all-electric vehicle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 1a. Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the fee imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text begin (b) This subdivision applies to a registration period starting on or before June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [168.0132] ROAD USAGE CHARGE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Account provider" means a person, firm, corporation, or partnership of firms or corporations that performs road usage charge management for enrolled vehicle owners and usage charge calculation under an agreement with the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) "Adjustment rate" means $0.065. new text end new text begin (d) "Analogous fuel economy" means distance traveled by a motor vehicle as it relates to fuel consumed by the vehicle, in miles per gallon, that applies for a specific vehicle classification and model year. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Usage charge. new text end new text begin (a) The owner of an all-electric vehicle must pay a road usage charge. The usage charge is in addition to the tax under section 168.013, subdivision 1a. The commissioner must impose the usage charge continuously for each registration period, using the relevant calculation under paragraph (b), (c), or both. new text end new text begin (b) For a billing period in which account management is active for a vehicle, the usage charge is calculated as: new text end new text begin (1) the miles traveled by the vehicle within Minnesota over the billing period; multiplied by new text end new text begin (2) the ratio that the total excise tax rate for gasoline under section 296A.07, including the surcharge rate under section 296A.083, bears to the analogous fuel economy, as determined in subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (c) For a billing period in which paragraph (b) does not apply, the usage charge is calculated as: new text end new text begin (1) the estimated average daily vehicle miles traveled per vehicle in Minnesota multiplied by the number of days in the billing period; multiplied by new text end new text begin (2) the total excise tax rate for gasoline under section 296A.07, including the surcharge rate under section 296A.083, divided by the analogous fuel economy, as determined in subdivision 3; plus new text end new text begin (3) the adjustment rate multiplied by the number of days in the billing period. new text end new text begin (d) The total road usage charge to an enrolled vehicle owner calculated in paragraph (b) for an entire vehicle registration period must not exceed the total that would otherwise apply under a corresponding calculation in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must estimate average daily vehicle miles traveled under paragraph (c), clause (1), in consultation with the commissioner of transportation, using the most recently available year of data. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Analogous fuel economy. new text end new text begin In consultation with the commissioner of transportation, the commissioner must determine analogous fuel economy for each vehicle subject to the usage charge under this section. The commissioner must use federal data on automotive trends maintained by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and the determination must be based on: new text end new text begin (1) the vehicle classification that applies to the vehicle from among the following types or successor types as specified by the Environmental Protection Agency: sedan/wagon, car sport utility vehicle, truck sport utility vehicle, minivan/van, or pickup; and new text end new text begin (2) for the relevant vehicle classification, the final estimated real-world fuel economy, in miles per gallon, for the year matching the model year of the vehicle, or if that data is unavailable, for the year prior to the model year of the vehicle. To the extent feasible, the estimate under this clause must exclude all-electric vehicles. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Road usage charge management agreement. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must enter into an agreement with one or more account providers to perform road usage charge management. Each agreement must specify: new text end new text begin (1) account provider responsibility to enroll vehicle owners in usage charge management; new text end new text begin (2) road usage charge calculations and verification; new text end new text begin (3) designated responsibility for road usage charge billing, collections, and remittance, which may be performed by the commissioner, the account provider, or a combination of both; new text end new text begin (4) policies to determine whether road usage charge management is active for a vehicle; new text end new text begin (5) policies on prepayment, account balance minimum, and balance replenishment; new text end new text begin (6) audit activity, which must include providing for revising prior usage charges based on submitted odometer information; new text end new text begin (7) account provider responsibility for customer service; new text end new text begin (8) road usage charge information that is available to each enrolled vehicle owner, which must include vehicle miles traveled over each billing period and an overview of usage charge calculation; new text end new text begin (9) requirements governing terms and conditions for enrolled vehicle owners; and new text end new text begin (10) standards for data security. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may award a contract for purposes of this subdivision under the best value method of contracting in conformance with chapter 16C. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Account providers; implementation capability. new text end new text begin (a) An account provider must be capable of accurately identifying miles traveled by the vehicle within Minnesota, whether from data supplied by a vehicle manufacturer or through a device that is affixed to the vehicle and transmits geolocation information. new text end new text begin (b) An account provider must have a reasonable anticipated capacity to implement, in the future, identification of vehicle miles traveled during specific times of day, over specific road segments, within managed lanes, and in a combination of these situations. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Account providers; data practices. new text end new text begin (a) An account provider must share with the commissioner the following data on an enrolled vehicle owner: new text end new text begin (1) data on the vehicle owner and the vehicle sufficient to identify the appropriate matching records in the driver and vehicle services information systems; new text end new text begin (2) the billing period; and new text end new text begin (3) the calculated usage charge amount. new text end new text begin (b) An account provider must submit the data listed in paragraph (a) electronically in the manner and by the dates specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) An account provider must not share with the commissioner, and the commissioner must not otherwise obtain from an account provider, geolocation data for a specifically identifiable vehicle. new text end new text begin (d) An account provider must not share or disseminate data on an enrolled vehicle owner with an entity other than the commissioner, except pursuant to a court order. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this subdivision prevents an account provider from sharing or disseminating summary data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 19. new text end new text begin (f) Services provided by an account provider under this section are not a government function for purposes of section 13.05, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (g) An account provider's agreement with the commissioner is subject to section 13.05, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Odometer data. new text end new text begin A manufacturer of a new motor vehicle sold or offered for sale within this state must provide access for vehicle mileage and odometer data to an account provider for purposes of this section, following authorization by the vehicle owner or lessee. The access must be provided through an application programming interface or other similar information technology. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Deposit of revenue. new text end new text begin The proceeds from the usage charge imposed and collected by the commissioner under this section must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund under section 161.045. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Legislative report. new text end new text begin (a) By November 15 annually, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance concerning the road usage charge. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) provide an implementation overview, including enrollment activity and vehicle miles traveled; new text end new text begin (2) summarize the agreement with each account provider, including information on each of the specified areas identified under subdivision 5, paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (3) review road usage charge finances, including total annual collections, revenue collected and deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund under subdivision 8, analogous fuel economy amounts, and average daily vehicle miles traveled estimates; and new text end new text begin (4) make recommendations, if any, on legislative changes to road usage charge requirements. new text end new text begin (b) This subdivision expires June 30, 2031. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to a registration period starting on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin ROAD USAGE CHARGE; PHASE-IN.new text end new text begin (a) For a road usage charge under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.0132, imposed in a billing period that starts on or after July 1, 2026, and before July 1, 2027: new text end new text begin (1) the amounts calculated under subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (2), and subdivision 2, paragraph (c), clause (2), are multiplied by 0.6; and new text end new text begin (2) the adjustment rate is multiplied by 0.6. new text end new text begin (b) For a road usage charge under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.0132, imposed in a billing period that starts on or after July 1, 2027, and before July 1, 2028: new text end new text begin (1) the amounts calculated under subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (2), and subdivision 2, paragraph (c), clause (2), are multiplied by 0.8; and new text end new text begin (2) the adjustment rate is multiplied by 0.8. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to a registration period starting on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ROAD USAGE CHARGE.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the driver and vehicle services operating account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety for administrative costs to implement the road usage charge under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.0132. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end